Tennessee, session 114, SB2602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-102(38), is amended by
deleting "one hundred fifty gallons (150 gals.)" and substituting "eight hundred thirty-five gallons
(835 gals.)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-8-103(14)(B)(v), is amended by
deleting "one hundred fifty gallons (150 gals.)" and substituting "eight hundred thirty-five gallons
(835 gals.)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2602
009734
- 1 -